Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4911, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Budget exception for persons with developmental disabilities and type 1 diabetes. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish a consumer-directed community supports budget exception process for persons with both developmental disabilities and type 1 diabetes in the home and community-based services waivers under sections 256B.092 and 256B.49. This budget exception process must be available for any person who has both of the following diagnoses documented in the person's assessment under section 256B.0911: new text end new text begin (1) a developmental disability; and new text end new text begin (2) type 1 diabetes. new text end new text begin (b) The amount of the exception must be an annualized amount equal to nine hours per day at the current rate for home care nursing provided by a registered nurse under the identified waiver program at the time of application for the budget exception under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end